Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.82.090

Orders restraining criminal profiteering—When issued.

During the pendency of any criminal case charging a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080, or an offense defined in RCW 9A.40.100, the superior court may, in addition to its other powers, issue an order pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 (2) or (3). Upon conviction of a person for a violation of RCW 9A.82.060 or 9A.82.080, or an offense defined in RCW 9A.40.100, the superior court may, in addition to its other powers of disposition, issue an order pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100.

[ 2003 c 267 s 5; 2001 c 222 s 13. Prior: 1985 c 455 s 10; 1984 c 270 s 9.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Effective date—2001 c 222: See notes following RCW 9A.82.001.